Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0223.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11a. (1) By Not later than March 31 each year, a research facility that uses laboratory animals shall submit a report to, and on a form provided by, the department that includes an attestation of compliance with the requirements of this act.all of the following information regarding the preceding calendar year: (a) The total number of laboratory animals owned by the research facility. (b) The total number of laboratory animals that are used for laboratory research conducted at the research facility. (c) The total number of laboratory animals released by the research facility. (2) The department shall use the information provided on a report submitted under subsection (1) for purposes of determining compliance under section 8a and shall not make any information provided on the report available on the department's website.